src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nm3-8a
!! sliocht - sleachta gs & pl
Nm3a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath		PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak:^G^Ath		PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath		PL-(LEA)A;


!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : +í

!! (A) nouns ending in -ín (a diminutive)
!! smidiríní (smithereens) no singular
!! eg. an cailín -> na cailíní (girls)
!! eg. an báidín -> na báidíní (small boats)

!! (B) nouns ending in -a
!! eg. an balla -> na ballaí (walls)


LEXICON Nm4-SINGULAR

+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D4;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nm4-1

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-Í;


LEXICON Nm4-2

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath			PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath	PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath			PL-Í;


LEXICON Nm4-3

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath			PL-TE;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath	PL-TE;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath			PL-TE;

LEXICON Nm4-4

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath			PL-THE;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath	PL-THE;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath			PL-THE;

LEXICON Nm4-5

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-(E)ACHA;

LEXICON Nm4-6

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-NNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-NNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-NNA;

LEXICON Nm4-7

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-(E)ANNA;

LEXICON Nm4-8

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-ITE;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-ITE;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-ITE;

LEXICON Nm4-9

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-ONNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-ONNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-ONNA;

LEXICON Nm4-10

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C		PL-OCHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-OCHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V		PL-OCHA;

LEXICON Nm4-11

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)THA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(LEA)THA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)THA;

!! 01/04/08
LEXICON Nm4-12

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C		PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V		PL-AÍ;

LEXICON Nm4-13

Nm4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C		PL-THANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-THANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V		PL-THANNA;

!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : +idí
!!!!!! SINGULAR  ALSO IN NUM-LEX.TXT
!! an fiche -> na fichidí (the twenties) eidí needs correcting
!! an caoga -> na caogaidí (the fifties)
LEXICON Nm5-1
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D5-4;
!!!+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-IDÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-IDÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-IDÍ;


LEXICON Nm5-2
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D5-5;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Coim			PL-(CAOL)EACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim	PL-(CAOL)EACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Coim			PL-(CAOL)EACHA;

LEXICON Nm5-3
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D5-6;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath			PL-THE;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath	PL-THE;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath			PL-THE;

!! GS +the
LEXICON Nm5-4
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D5-7;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

!!!PL?????????

!! GS +te
LEXICON Nm5-5-SINGULAR
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D5-8;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nm5-5				! PL +TÍ 
Nm5-5-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Atht			PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Atht		PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Atht			PL-Í;


!! GS +tha
!! PL +thaí
!! bascadh - basctha - bascthaí
LEXICON Nm5-6
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D5-9;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Aththa		PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Aththa		PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Aththa		PL-Í;

!!!PL?????????

!! GS +ta
LEXICON Nm5-7-SINGULAR
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D5-10;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nm5-7
Nm5-7-SINGULAR;

!! moladh / gs = molta / pl = moltaí
LEXICON Nm5-7a
Nm5-7-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Atht			PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Atht		PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Atht			PL-AÍ;

!----------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON Ns
+Subst+Noun+Sg:0	NounSéUrú;

LEXICON Nspl
+Subst+Noun+Pl:0	NounSéUrú;

!************************************************************************** 
!! INITIAL MUTATIONS
!************************************************************************** 
!-------------------
!! NOMINATIVE SINGULAR 
!-------------------
LEXICON Nom-sg-initial
NounSéUrú;		
+DefArt:^Sé^tv^ts	#; 	! definite article eg. an cat (m) (p38 NIG)
			! an t-éan(m) - the bird (p39 NIG) 
			! an bhróg(f) - the shoe
			! initial mutation for other reasons
			! e.g. comp. preps. ar an gcnoc, poss. mo chat

!! ^IM = initial mutation e.g. with prepositions, and possession
!! Singular:
!! e.g. ar an bhosca, ar an mbosca
!! possessive markers on vowels: ár n-athair, a (f) hathair, 
!! Plural:
!! e.g. ar bhoscaí, i mboscaí
!! possessive e.g. ár n-aithreacha - our fathers (^C)

LEXICON NounSéUrú
#;			! indefinite => no initial mutation
Emphasis;
+Ecl:^IM^Urú	Emphasis;		
+Len:^IM^Sé	Emphasis;		
+hPref:^IM^hv	Emphasis;	!! adds ^h to vowel-initial words ...  but adds the +hPref to all words ... see fix file
					

LEXICON Emphasis
#;
+Emph:s^Emph	#;   			!  NEEDS 1PL NE/NA & 3PL SEAN/SAN ALSO
!!! added 8/5/2014 EUD for theach-sa etc.
+Emph:%-s^Emph	#;   			!  NEEDS 1PL NE/NA & 3PL SEAN/SAN ALSO	


!-------------------
!! GENITIVE SINGULAR 
!-------------------

LEXICON Gen-sg-initial
NounSéUrú;			! eg. tábhacht a n-oidhreachta
#; 			! eg. bia cait, bia sagairt, bia stóir, 
			!     bia rúin, pobail  
			!     siopa grósaera - a grocer's shop
+DefArt:^Sé^hv^ts	#; 	! eg. bia an chait,an íl, bia an stóir 
			!     bia an éin (the bird's food)
			! eg. bia an tsagairt (overgenerates 
			!     tshagairt, h will be removed,
			! eg. bia an rúin, an phobail
			! eg. siopa an ghrósaera - the grocer's shop
!-------------------
!! VOCATIVE SINGULAR 
!-------------------
!! Since this is trivial (always ^Sé) it is included with Final Mutations
!! in Voc-sg-0 and Voc-sg-1.
					
!------------
!! ALL PLURALS
!------------
!! Note: Vocative Plural does not require Def & Idf but it is easier to generate 
!! them and remove all Voc Pl Idfs at the end (the Def form is correct 
!! although the Def marker is unnecessary)

LEXICON Pl-initial
+DefArt:^Sé^Urú^hv			#; 	! eg. na cait (m)
NounSéUrú;					! optional initial mutations for posession, after prepositions

!************************************************************************** 
!! FINAL MUTATIONS
!************************************************************************** 
!-------------------
!! NOMINATIVE SINGULAR
!-------------------
LEXICON Nom-sg
+Sg:0	Nom-sg-initial;

!-------------------
!! GENITIVE SINGULAR 
!-------------------

LEXICON Gen-sg-D1		! 1st. Declension - Caolú (Slenderise)
+Sg:^Caol	Gen-sg-initial;

LEXICON Gen-sg-D2		! 2nd. Declension - Caolú (Slenderise) and
				! Add "e"
+Sg:^Caole	Gen-sg-initial;

LEXICON Gen-sg-D2a		! 2nd. Declension - each -> í, ach -> aí 
				! tintreach - tintrí 
+Sg:^Ath	Gen-sg-initial;

LEXICON Gen-sg-D3		! 3rd. Declension -  Broaden (Leathnú) and
				! Add "a"
+Sg:^Leaa	Gen-sg-initial;


LEXICON Gen-sg-D4		! 4th. Declension - No change
+Sg:0	Gen-sg-initial;

LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-1		! 5th. Declension - (Broaden) + ach
+Sg:^Leaach	Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-2		! 5th. Declension - Sync + (e)ach
+Sg:^Coim^VHach	Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-2a		! 5th. Declension - Sync + a
+Sg:^Coim^VHa	Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-2b		! 5th. Declension - Sync + Slen + e
+Sg:^Coim^Caole	Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-3		! 5th. Declension - Add "n"
+Sg:n		Gen-sg-initial;
